Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 42 Finance and Administration Cabinet
42.0651.
Duties of Division of State Risk and Insurance Services — Assistance from
other agencies — Risk management program.

The Division of State Risk and Insurance Services shall:

Oversee and assist the management of the state fire and tornado insurance fund established in KRS Chapter 56;

Develop and manage programs of risk assessment and insurance for the protection of state property not covered by the state fire and tornado insurance fund;

Advise the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet on the fiscal management of programs relating to life insurance, workers’ compensation, and health care benefits for state employees;

Serve as the central clearinghouse for coordinating and evaluating existing and new risk management programs within all state agencies;

Develop financing techniques for risk protection;

Provide insurance for all state-owned and state-operated facilities and vehicles; and

Develop and implement other risk management, insurance, and self-insurance programs or other functions and duties as the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may direct the division to undertake and implement within the general statutory authority and control of the Finance and Administration Cabinet over state property and fiscal affairs of the executive branch of state government, including, but not limited to, those areas pertaining to tort and contractual liability, fidelity, and property risks.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted as affecting the operation of the employee benefit programs generally administered by the Office of Employee Relations and Department of Employee Insurance within the Personnel Cabinet. These agencies shall coordinate the operation of life insurance, workers’ compensation, health care benefit programs, and other self-insured programs with the Division of State Risk and Insurance Services.

All cabinets, departments, boards, commissions, and other state agencies shall provide to the Division of State Risk and Insurance Services the technical advice and other assistance the Division of State Risk and Insurance Services or the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall request in the performance of the functions of the division as described in this section.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have the power and authority to promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A for purposes of implementing a risk management program for the executive branch of state government. Any administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary shall be administered by the Division of State Risk and Insurance Services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 377, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; amend. and redesig. Acts 1994, ch. 116, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 216, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 82, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 62, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 164, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 85, § 14, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 32, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact. and amend, Acts 2012, ch. 69, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 10, § 7, effective July 12, 2012.

42.066.
Division of Occupations and Professions — Services for boards and commissions — Charges — Complaints — Acceptance of personal checks in payment of license renewal fees. [Repealed and reenacted.]

42.068.
Activation of KRS 42.064 and 42.066. [Repealed.]

42.070.
Manner for letting contracts for materials, supplies and equipment; advertisement. [Repealed.]

42.071.
Purchases from the federal government or a federal agency. [Repealed.]

42.072.
Purchase price to be set out in bill of sale or deed. [Repealed.]

42.075.
Preferred status of products of the blind. [Repealed.]

42.076.
Collusion to restrain bids prohibited — Affidavit. [Repealed and reenacted.]

42.080.
Names of seller’s representatives to accompany bid or estimate for contract with state agency. [Repealed.]

42.090.
Names of seller’s representatives to appear on invoice. [Repealed.]

42.100.
Representatives to be listed with Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

42.110.
Division of Personnel Efficiency. [Repealed.]

42.120.
Examination and classification of state employes. [Repealed.]

42.130.
Change of status of employes; payrolls to be checked. [Repealed.]

42.140.
Removal of state employes. [Repealed.]

42.150.
Political activity prohibited. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

42.160.
Mismanagement of state affairs, duty of department in case of. [Repealed.]

42.170.
Functions of state local debt officer exercised by Office of the Controller. [Repealed.]

42.180.
Transfer of archives and records functions to department. [Repealed.]

42.190.
Cost projections of Firefighters Foundation Program fund and Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund — Disposition of funds collected under KRS 136.392 — Lapsing of certain funds — Monthly reports.

On June 1, 1982, and then on or before the first day of each December, March, June, and September thereafter, the cabinet shall request in writing of the administrator of the Firefighters Foundation Program fund, which is established by KRS

95A.220

, and of the administrator of the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund, which is established by KRS

15.430

, cost projections of their respective funds for the next quarter. Based on these projections, the cabinet shall determine the proportionate share of total insurance premium surcharge proceeds, prescribed in KRS

136.392

, to accrue to each fund.

On or before the first day of each quarter, the cabinet shall certify to the State Treasurer a distribution schedule describing the proportionate share of total insurance premium surcharge proceeds accruing to each fund during such quarter, and the State Treasurer shall pay into each fund’s trust and agency account its proportionate share of all deposited tax moneys as set forth and in the manner as prescribed in KRS

136.392

.

Moneys deposited in the Firefighters Foundation Program fund’s trust and agency account, and in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund’s trust and agency account, shall be invested by the state in accordance with state investment practices, and all earnings from such investments shall accrue to, and be paid into the respective account from which such investments are made. All moneys remaining on deposit at the close of the state’s fiscal year in the Firefighters Foundation Program fund’s trust and agency account and all earnings from investments made from moneys in this account in excess of three million dollars ($3,000,000), beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999, shall lapse, except that moneys in the revolving loan fund established in KRS

95A.262

shall not lapse. All moneys remaining on deposit at the close of the state’s fiscal year in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund’s trust and agency account, and all earnings from investments made from moneys in this account, in excess of three million dollars ($3,000,000), beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999, shall lapse. On and after July 1, 1999, moneys in these accounts shall not lapse.

The cabinet shall provide monthly financial reports to the administrator of the Firefighters Foundation Program fund and the administrator of the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund respecting the amount of funds received and on deposit in each fund and the amount of earnings accruing to each fund from their investment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 300, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 381, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 244, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 510, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 244, sec. 6, and ch. 510, sec. 6, which are identical and have been codified together.

42.200.
Water project interest rate buy down fund — Funding sources, purposes, uses, and administration.

The water project interest rate buy down fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall include earnings from investments of moneys in the fund. Any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year, and moneys in this fund shall be continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.

The fund shall be used to provide financial assistance to government agencies for the construction of publicly owned water supply projects located in rural areas of the Commonwealth. In order to qualify for the financial assistance, the governmental agency shall obtain a loan from a bank or combined bank and trust company organized under the laws of this Commonwealth and at an interest rate no greater than two (2) percentage points higher than the current prime rate. The financial assistance provided shall consist of an annual grant to the governmental agency to be made over the life of the loan obtained by the governmental agency for the construction of the publicly owned water supply project. The amount of the annual grant shall be calculated over the life of the loan to provide to the governmental agency each year the portion of the interest on the loan calculated at a four percent (4%) interest rate. The governmental agency shall be responsible for the payment of the interest on the loan in excess of the four percent (4%) interest rate and for the payment of the principal on the loan.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall administer the fund and may promulgate administrative regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. The Department for Local Government shall advise government agencies of the fund and how to apply for moneys from the fund.

The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky Rural Water Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 322, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 69, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 14, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 20, effective July 15, 2010.

42.205.
Permanent pension fund.

There is hereby established within the Finance and Administration Cabinet the Kentucky permanent pension fund for the purpose of addressing the Commonwealth’s unfunded pension liabilities. The proceeds contained in this fund shall be used only for contributions to the Commonwealth’s pension funds.

The fund may receive:

State appropriations;

The net proceeds from the sale of real property owned by the Commonwealth or any agency thereof; and

Any settlements or judgments resulting from litigation in which the Commonwealth or any of its agencies is a party, after costs of litigation and mandatory deductions or restitution to consumers have been deducted.

Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested pursuant to KRS

42.500

.

Income earned from the investments shall be credited to and become part of the fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. All amounts in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be expended or appropriated without the express authority in an enacted biennial budget bill.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 133, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

42.210.
Office of state curator established — Purpose. [Repealed.]

42.220.
Qualifications — Selection — Terms — Salary. [Repealed.]

42.230.
Curator to be in department of finance and work with department. [Repealed.]

42.240.
Curator to replace mansion committee — Duties. [Repealed.]

42.250.
Acceptance of gifts — Articles of dedication. [Repealed.]

42.260.
Duties as to items removed from executive mansion, old governor’s mansion, state shrines and historic homes. [Repealed.]

42.270.
Inventory. [Repealed.]

42.280.
Use or storage of items by governor or lieutenant governor — Procedure as to new items. [Repealed.]

42.290.
Cooperation by departments, agencies, etc. [Repealed.]

42.300.
Coal producing county development fund. [Repealed.]

42.310.
Advisory committee — Membership — Functions. [Repealed.]

42.320.
Court cost distribution fund — Disbursements — Payments into general fund.

There is hereby established the court cost distribution fund, which is created to provide a central account into which the court costs collected by all circuit clerks, under KRS 23A.205(1) and 24A.175(1), shall be paid.

The fund shall be administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall make monthly disbursements from the fund according to the following schedule:

Forty-nine percent (49%) of each court cost shall be paid into the general fund;

Ten and eight-tenths percent (10.8%) of each court cost, up to five million four hundred thousand dollars ($5,400,000), shall be paid into the State Treasury for the benefit and use of the Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority under KRS

441.605

to

441.695

;

Six and one-half percent (6.5%) of each court cost, up to three million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,250,000), shall be paid into the spinal cord and head injury research trust fund created in KRS

211.504

;

Five and one-half percent (5.5%) of each court cost, up to two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000), shall be paid into the traumatic brain injury trust fund created in KRS

211.476

;

Five percent (5%) of each court cost, up to two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), shall be paid into a trust and agency account with the Administrative Office of the Courts and is to be used by the circuit clerks to hire additional deputy clerks and to enhance deputy clerk salaries;

Three and one-half percent (3.5%) of each court cost, up to one million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,750,000), shall be paid to a special trust and agency account that shall not lapse for the Department of Public Advocacy;

Three and four-tenths percent (3.4%) of each court cost, up to one million seven hundred thousand dollars ($1,700,000), shall be paid into the crime victims’ compensation fund created in KRS

49.480

;

Seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) of each court cost, up to three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), shall be paid to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet to defray the costs of conducting record checks on prospective firearms purchasers pursuant to the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act and for the collection, testing, and storing of DNA samples;

Ten and one-tenth percent (10.1%) of each court cost, up to five million fifty thousand dollars ($5,050,000), deposited in the fund shall be paid to the county sheriff in the county from which the court cost was received; and

Five and one-half percent (5.5%) of each court cost, up to two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000), deposited in the fund shall be paid to the county treasurer in the county from which the court cost was received and shall be used by the fiscal court in that county for the purposes of defraying the costs of operation of the county jail and the transportation of prisoners.

Any moneys remaining in the fund after the monthly disbursements in subsection (2) of this section shall be paid into the general fund.

Any moneys collected above the prescribed amount shall be paid into the general fund.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 183, § 9, effective August 1, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 123, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 74, § 60, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 167, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by 2017 Ky. Acts chs. 74 and 167, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(7/15/2002). This statute number, KRS

42.320

, was previously used for a KRS section that was repealed. That earlier section (1974 Ky. Acts ch. 74, Art. VIII, Part I, sec. 1; 1982 Ky. Acts ch. 396, sec. 5) was repealed by 1982 Ky. Acts ch. 450, sec. 79, effective July 1, 1983. The catchline at repeal read, “State clearinghouse functions for federal funds.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 4, (2) at 1684.

42.325.
Definitions for KRS 42.330 to 42.340. [Repealed.]

42.330.
Coal severance economic aid fund — Use — Board. [Repealed.]

42.332.
Examination and approval of capital projects. [Repealed.]

42.334.
Apportionment of funds. [Repealed.]

42.340.
Rules and regulations as to coal severance economic aid fund and projects. [Repealed.]